Georgia, session 2025_26, HB848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 848
- 1 -

LC 44 3186/AP
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the Polk County school district,
including, but not limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire county
school district bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended.
(b)(1) Each resident of the Polk County school district who is at least 65 years of age but
not yet 70 years of age on January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption
is made is granted an exemption on that person's homestead from Polk County school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of the greater of 50
percent or $60,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(2) Each resident of the Polk County school district who is at least 70 years of age but
not yet 77 years of age on January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption
is made is granted an exemption on that person's homestead from Polk County school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of the greater of 75
percent or $80,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(3) Each resident of the Polk County school district who is at least 77 years of age or
older on January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption is made is granted
an exemption on that person's homestead from Polk County school district ad valorem
taxes for educational purposes in the amount of the full assessed value of that homestead
that does not exceed $500,000.00 appraised fair market value. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
H. B. 848
- 2 -

LC 44 3186/AP
(4) In calendar year 2026, the maximum amount of homestead exemptions granted under
this Act shall not exceed $150 million in the aggregate annually. Upon the closing of the
books for the filing of homestead exemptions for such taxable year, the Polk County
governing authority or its designee shall calculate the aggregate amount of homestead
exemptions claimed under this Act for such taxable year. If such total is equal to or less
than $150 million in the aggregate for that taxable year, then each senior citizen claiming
a homestead exemption under this Act shall receive the full value of such exemption. If
the total exceeds $150 million in the aggregate for that taxable year, the governing
authority or its designee shall calculate the amount by which the total exceeds $150
million and shall reduce the amount of homestead exemptions claimed by such senior
citizens in an amount equal to such difference so that the total amount of homestead
exemptions being claimed under this Act for such taxable year shall equal $150 million.
Such reduction shall be applied on proportionate basis.
(c) A person shall not receive any homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner
of Polk County, giving such person's age and such additional information relative to
receiving such exemption as will enable the tax commissioner of Polk County to make a
determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such
exemption. The tax commissioner of Polk County shall provide application forms for this
purpose.
(d) The exemptions shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemptions shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted a homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted a homestead exemption under subsection (b) of
H. B. 848
- 3 -

LC 44 3186/AP
this section to notify the tax commissioner of Polk County in the event that such person for
any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemptions granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, municipal ad valorem
taxes for municipal purposes, or independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes. The homestead exemptions granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in
addition to and not in lieu of any other homestead exemption applicable to Polk County
school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Polk County shall call and conduct an election as provided
in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Polk County school
district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that election on
the Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 2025 and shall issue the call and conduct
that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the date and
purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding
the date thereof in the official organ of Polk County. The ballot shall have written or printed
thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
Polk County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the
amount of the greater of 50 percent or $60,000.00 of the assessed value of
( ) NO the homestead for residents of that school district who are at least 65 years
H. B. 848
- 4 -

LC 44 3186/AP
of age, in the amount of the greater of 75 percent or $80,000.00 of the
assessed value of the homestead for residents of that school district who are
at least 70 years of age, and in the amount of the full assessed value of the
homestead that does not exceed $500,000.00 appraised fair market value for
residents of that school district who are at least 77 years of age, with an
annual aggregate cap of $150 million in calendar year 2026?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
100 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
101 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
102 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
103 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
104 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Polk County. It shall be the
105 election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
106 provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
107 intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
108 section, any elector of the Polk County school district may apply for a writ of mandamus to
109 compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
110 court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
111 fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
112 election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
113 elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
114 SECTION 4.
115 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
116 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
H. B. 848
- 5 -

LC 44 3186/AP
117 SECTION 5.
118 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 848
- 6 -